Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-903
Member of Active Selected Reserve; responsibility to obtain certificate of performance; prerequisite to tuition credit.

It shall be the responsibility of the individual member of the Active Selected Reserve to obtain a certificate from the member's commanding officer attesting to the member's satisfactory performance and to submit it to the Director of Veterans' Affairs who, if finding that granting the entitlement will not exceed the limitation of entitlements provided in section 80-902, shall endorse the certificate of performance as approved and return it to the member for presentation to the college or university in order to obtain tuition credit upon initial enrollment. Such certification, without the necessity of endorsement by the Director of Veterans' Affairs, shall be accomplished and presented at the time of enrollment for each subsequent term for which tuition credit is requested.

Laws 1976, LB 266, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB4, § 3.